Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1273
Fees; placed in State Game Fund; how used.

All fees as provided by the State Boat Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Game Fund to be used primarily for (1) administration and enforcement of the State Boat Act, (2) boating safety educational programs, (3) the construction and maintenance of boating and docking facilities, navigation aids, and access to boating areas and such other uses as will promote the safety and convenience of the boating public in Nebraska, (4) the Aquatic Invasive Species Program, and (5) publishing costs subject to the restrictions and limitations in section 37-324. Secondary uses for the fees shall be for the propagation, importation, protection, preservation, and distribution of game and fish and necessary equipment therefor and all things pertaining thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 73;

Laws 1987, LB 785, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 401;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 26;

Laws 2015, LB142, § 7.